Utah statutes.
71-8-6.   Government entity participation.

(1)  This section applies to:

(a)  the Department of Human Services;

(b)  the institutions of higher education listed in Section 53B-1-102;

(c)  the Division of Professional and Occupational Licensing;

(d)  the Department of Public Safety;

(e)  the Department of Workforce Services; and

(f)  the Department of Health.

(2)  Each entity in Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  assign a full-time employee, who preferably shall be a veteran, as a veterans' services specialist as part of their duties to coordinate the provision of veterans' services with the department; and

(b)  provide the department with nonprotected or nonprivate information about services provided to veterans.

(3)  Each entity shall post on the entity's website:

(a)  all services available for veterans from the entity and the contact information for the veterans' services specialist; and

(b)  a link to the department with the contact information for the veterans' services coordinator.



Enacted by Chapter 308, 2013 General Session

